Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1712.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Department of health services; obsessive political preoccupation; research; report; delayed repeal; definition A. The director of the department of health services shall conduct or support research to advance the understanding of obsessive political preoccupation, including its origins, manifestations and long-term effects on individuals, communities and public discourse. b. The research conducted prescribed by subsection A of this section shall include: 1. Efforts to identify the initial emergence or earliest documented cases of obsessive political preoccupation, including historical and social analyses to trace the onset. 2. An investigation of the long-term psychological, social or behavioral impacts of obsessive political preoccupation on affected individuals, communities or public discourse. 3. An analysis of contributing factors, such as media exposure, political polarization or social dynamics, to the development or spread of obsessive political preoccupation. 4. Exploration of potential interventions or strategies to mitigate or prevent obsessive political preoccupation. c. The director of the department of health services shall collaborate with mental health professionals, academic institutions and relevant state agencies as appropriate to achieve the objectives described in subsection B of this section. D. Not later than one year after the effective date of this section, the director of the department of health services shall submit a report to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives and the governor on the following: 1. The progress of research conducted pursuant to this section. 2. Any findings related to the initial emergence or long-term effects of obsessive political preoccupation. 3. Recommendations for further research or public health actions. E. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2027. F. For the purposes of this section, "obsessive political preoccupation" means a behavioral or psychological phenomenon that is characterized by intense emotional or psychological reactions to Donald J. Trump, his actions or his public presence as observed in individuals or groups. Sec. 2. Legislative findings A. The legislature finds that: 1. The United States thrives on liberty, opportunity and civil discourse, yet extreme political polarization has fractured national unity, threatening the democratic values cherished by Arizonans. 2. From 2017 to 2021, President Donald J. Trump's Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 reduced the corporate tax rate from 35 percent to 21 percent, driving record economic growth with a median household income of $68,700 in 2019. 3. President Trump's first term achieved historic unemployment lows of 5.4 percent for African-Americans and 3.9 percent for Hispanic-Americans in 2019, lifting millions out of poverty and advancing opportunity for all. 4. Through deregulation, President Trump eliminated 22 regulations for every new one in 2017, saving $33 billion annually by 2018, empowering Arizona's small businesses and innovators. 5. The Abraham Accords of 2020, brokered by President Trump, normalized relations between Israel and nations like the United Arab Emirates and Bahrain, strengthening America's global leadership. 6. After reelection on January 20, 2025, President Trump issued over 200 executive actions, eliminating harmful mandates and affirming biological truth in federal policy to protect family values. 7. The Laken Riley Act, signed January 29, 2025, has enhanced border security by mandating detention of criminal illegal aliens, better safeguarding Arizona communities. 8. Through tariffs, President Trump's economic policies in his second term have added 671,000 jobs by July 2025 and generated a $27.2 billion surplus in the Department of the Treasury, bolstering prosperity. 9. In 2025, President Trump brokered a Gaza ceasefire and aided Israel in resolving the June Iran-Israel conflict, reinforcing America's role as a global peacemaker. 10. Despite these contributions to America's prosperity, security and values, obsessive political preoccupation has emerged since his 2016 campaign. 11. Selective media reporting and amplification of unverified claims about President Trump's conduct have fueled obsessive political preoccupation, intensifying polarized public reactions and deepening societal division. 12. Obsessive political preoccupation has led to significant social harm, with Americans who support President Trump or his policies reporting discrimination, intimidation or ostracism in professional, academic and social settings, further eroding community cohesion. 13. Obsessive political preoccupation has contributed to psychological harm, with studies from the American Psychological Association documenting surges in political anxiety and bias during Trump's tenure, undermining civil discourse in Arizona and beyond. 14. This irrational animus culminated in two assassination attempts on President Trump, one in Blazer, Pennsylvania on July 13, 2024 where a gunman grazed President Trump's ear and killed a bystander, and another at his Florida golf course on September 15, 2024, both demonstrating the dangerous escalation of obsessive political preoccupation-driven hatred. 15. The people of Arizona have a proud history of independent thought, open debate and a patriotic commitment to preserving liberty and the rule of law. 16. A comprehensive approach is required to address obsessive political preoccupation and its impact on public health by studying its origins, manifestations and effects to inform strategies for promoting civil well-being and reducing societal division. B. Based on these findings: 1. The legislature declares obsessive political preoccupation to be a public health crisis that affects mental health, social cohesion and political stability in this state. 2. The purpose of this act is to protect public health and respond to the harms of political polarization by: (a) Directing the Department of Health Services to conduct or support research on obsessive political preoccupation, including its psychological and social impacts. (b) Requiring the department to collaborate with mental health professionals and other stakeholders to develop interventions for mitigating obsessive political preoccupation-related division. (c) Mandating a report on findings and recommendations to state leaders within one year to guide future public health strategies. Sec. 3. Short title This act may be cited as the "Obsessive Political Preoccupation Study Act".